Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5801
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-5801 to 77-5808 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Advantage Research and Development Act.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 59;

Laws 2009, LB403, § 12;

Laws 2014, LB836, § 4.